tables/fa-ir-shortwriting-1393.ctb
# Table 2-11, prefix dot 5 (printed pages 79-80).
word آمو 5-345
partword آمو 5-345
word بعد 5-12
partword بعد 5-12
word پیر 5-1234
partword پیر 5-1234
word توجه 5-2345
partword توجه 5-2345
word مؤثر 5-1456
partword مؤثر 5-1456
word جزء 5-245
partword جزء 5-245
word چون 5-14
partword چون 5-14
word حکم 5-156
partword حکم 5-156
word خور 5-1346
partword خور 5-1346
word دور 5-145
partword دور 5-145
word گذار 5-2346
partword گذار 5-2346
word روز 5-1235
partword روز 5-1235
word زیبا 5-1356
partword زیبا 5-1356
word سخن 5-234
partword سخن 5-234
word شود 5-146
partword شود 5-146
word خصوص 5-12346
partword خصوص 5-12346
word موضوع 5-1246
partword موضوع 5-1246
word طور 5-23456
partword طور 5-23456
word منظور 5-123456
partword منظور 5-123456
word علوم 5-12356
partword علوم 5-12356
word وغیره 5-126
partword وغیره 5-126
word فرو 5-124
partword فرو 5-124
word قبل 5-12345
partword قبل 5-12345
word کوتاه 5-13
partword کوتاه 5-13
word گون 5-1245
partword گون 5-1245
word مفهوم 5-134
partword مفهوم 5-134
word نشان 5-1345
partword نشان 5-1345
word وقوع 5-2456
partword وقوع 5-2456
word هنوز 5-125
partword هنوز 5-125
word یاد 5-24
partword یاد 5-24

# Table 2-12, prefix dots 45 (printed pages 80-81).
word آخر 45-345
partword آخر 45-345
word پیش 45-1234
partword پیش 45-1234
word ترکیب 45-2345
partword ترکیب 45-2345
word مثال 45-1456
partword مثال 45-1456
word جهان 45-245
partword جهان 45-245
word چیز 45-14
partword چیز 45-14
word حقیق 45-156
partword حقیق 45-156
word خویش 45-1346
partword خویش 45-1346
word دیگر 45-145
partword دیگر 45-145
word گذاشت 45-2346
partword گذاشت 45-2346
word رسی 45-1235
partword رسی 45-1235
word زمین 45-1356
partword زمین 45-1356
word سوی 45-234
partword سوی 45-234
word شهر 45-146
partword شهر 45-146
word اصطلاح 45-12346
partword اصطلاح 45-12346
word توضیح 45-1246
partword توضیح 45-1246
word طبیع 45-23456
partword طبیع 45-23456
word ظاهر 45-123456
partword ظاهر 45-123456
word عبارت 45-12356
partword عبارت 45-12356
word تغییر 45-126
partword تغییر 45-126
word فعل 45-124
partword فعل 45-124
word قدیم 45-12345
partword قدیم 45-12345
word کشور 45-13
partword کشور 45-13
word گیر 45-1245
partword گیر 45-1245
word مختلف 45-134
partword مختلف 45-134
word نزدیک 45-1345
partword نزدیک 45-1345
word وسیله 45-2456
partword وسیله 45-2456
word هیچ 45-125
partword هیچ 45-125
word یعنی 45-24
partword یعنی 45-24

# Table 2-13, prefix dots 46 (printed pages 81-83).
word آور 46-345
partword آور 46-345
# The visible row assigns بخش even though the following source note says ب
# is unused. The visible table row is implemented.
word بخش 46-12
partword بخش 46-12
word پرس 46-1234
partword پرس 46-1234
word توان 46-2345
partword توان 46-2345
word ثمر 46-1456
partword ثمر 46-1456
word جوان 46-245
partword جوان 46-245
word چنین 46-14
partword چنین 46-14
word حرکت 46-156
partword حرکت 46-156
word خواه 46-1346
partword خواه 46-1346
word دهد 46-145
partword دهد 46-145
word گذر 46-2346
partword گذر 46-2346
word رود 46-1235
partword رود 46-1235
word زمان 46-1356
partword زمان 46-1356
word ساز 46-234
partword ساز 46-234
word شناس 46-146
partword شناس 46-146
word شخص 46-12346
partword شخص 46-12346
word مضاف 46-1246
partword مضاف 46-1246
word مطالب 46-23456
partword مطالب 46-23456
word نظم 46-123456
partword نظم 46-123456
word عاد 46-12356
partword عاد 46-12356
word غرب 46-126
partword غرب 46-126
word افزود 46-124
partword افزود 46-124
word قسمت 46-12345
partword قسمت 46-12345
word کلمه 46-13
partword کلمه 46-13
word گوی 46-1245
partword گوی 46-1245
word محمد 46-134
partword محمد 46-134
word نویس 46-1345
partword نویس 46-1345
word وقت 46-2456
partword وقت 46-2456
word هنگام 46-125
partword هنگام 46-125
word یکی 46-24
partword یکی 46-24

# Table 2-14, prefix dots 456 (printed pages 83-84).
word آمد 456-345
partword آمد 456-345
word بود 456-12
partword بود 456-12
word پیامبر 456-1234
partword پیامبر 456-1234
word تاریخ 456-2345
partword تاریخ 456-2345
word تأثیر 456-1456
partword تأثیر 456-1456
word جمع 456-245
partword جمع 456-245
word چشم 456-14
partword چشم 456-14
word احساس 456-156
partword احساس 456-156
word خوان 456-1346
partword خوان 456-1346
word داشت 456-145
partword داشت 456-145
word گذشت 456-2346
partword گذشت 456-2346
word رفت 456-1235
partword رفت 456-1235
word زندگی 456-1356
partword زندگی 456-1356
word ساخت 456-234
partword ساخت 456-234
word شده 456-146
partword شده 456-146
word صفت 456-12346
partword صفت 456-12346
word ضمیر 456-1246
partword ضمیر 456-1246
word طلب 456-23456
partword طلب 456-23456
word نظیر 456-123456
partword نظیر 456-123456
word علم 456-12356
partword علم 456-12356
word پیغمبر 456-126
partword پیغمبر 456-126
word افتاد 456-124
partword افتاد 456-124
word دقیق 456-12345
partword دقیق 456-12345
word کنید 456-13
partword کنید 456-13
word گفت 456-1245
partword گفت 456-1245
word مسلمان 456-134
partword مسلمان 456-134
word نوشت 456-1345
partword نوشت 456-1345
word وجود 456-2456
partword وجود 456-2456
word هرگز 456-125
partword هرگز 456-125
word یافت 456-24
partword یافت 456-24

# Table 2-15, positional fragment signs (printed pages 86-88; signs recovered
# from the repeated table on printed pages 367-369).
#
# Standalone contractions whose result has no top-row dot use lowword. This
# conservatively prevents an adjacent punctuation cell from creating the
# source's forbidden pair of two short-height signs. Lower-cell fragments are
# temporarily marked with virtual dots for the multipass adjacency check.

# Row 1, dots 15.
begword بر 15
midword بر 15
endword بر 15
word بر 15
word برابر 4-15
word بزرگ 5-15
word بسیار 45-15
word بهتر 46-15
word بلکه 456-15

# Row 2, dots 136.
begword در 136
midword در 136
endword در 136
word در 136

# Row 3, dots 13456.
begword می 13456
midword می 13456
endword می 13456
word می 13456
word معروف 4-13456
word مورد 5-13456
word معین 45-13456
word مقصود 46-13456
word معمول 456-13456

# Row 4, dots 246.
begword نی 246
midword نی 246
endword نی 246
word نی 246
word نوع 5-246
word نتیجه 45-246
word نابینا 46-246
word نمونه 456-246

# Row 5, dots 135.
begword ری 135
midword ری 135
endword ری 135
word ری 135
word روی 5-135
word رنگ 45-135
word روشن 46-135
# The source literally prints رور in both occurrences. It is likely a typo
# for روز, but silently changing it would make this historical table less
# auditable; روز retains its Table 2-11 assignment above.
word رور 456-135

# Row 6, dots 12456.
begword ار 12456
midword ار 12456
endword ار 12456
word ار 12456
word اداره 45-12456
word اشاره 46-12456
word اشعار 456-12456

# Row 7, dots 34.
begword است 34
midword ست 34
endword ست 34
word است 34
word استفاده 46-34
word خواست 456-34

# Row 8, dots 26.
begword ان 26a
midword ان 26a
endword ان 26a
lowword آن 269ab
word انسان 46-26
word آنجا 456-26

# Row 9, dots 35.
begword این 35b
midword این 35b
endword ین 35c
lowword این 35b
word اینجا 456-35

# Row 10, dots 345.
begword آ 345
midword آ 345
endword ها 345
# The manual also permits a source-space before plural ها, but says that ها
# must remain fully spelled and detached after the bare جمله word sign.
word جمله\sها 245-0-125-1
word جملهها 245-0-125-1
endword \sها 345
# endword does not match before attached punctuation. Context rules preserve
# the same plural behavior there; the longer جمله exceptions win first.
noback context ["جمله\sها"]$p @245-0-125-1
noback context ["جملهها"]$p @245-0-125-1
noback context $l["\sها"]$p @345
noback context $l["ها"]$p @345
# The standalone تا mapping is already present in Table 2-7.

# Row 11, dots 235. The final-position entry is the exclamation mark,
# inherited from the Grade 1 punctuation definition rather than a print word.
begword هم 235d
midword هم 235d
lowword هم 235d

# Row 12, dots 346.
begword ام 346
midword ام 346
endword ام 346
word ام 346

# Row 13, dots 16.
begword ای 16
midword ای 16
endword ای 16
word ای 16

# Row 14, dots 23. The final-position entry is tanwin fath, inherited from
# the Grade 1 character definition rather than a print word.
begword با 23e
midword با 23e
lowword با 23e
word باشد 456-23

# Row 15, dots 2356.
begword گر 2356f
midword گر 2356f
endword گر 2356f
lowword گر 2356f
word گرفت 456-2356

# Row 16, dots 256. The final-position entry is the full stop.
begword دی 2569a
midword دی 2569a
lowword دی 2569a

# Row 17, dots 356.
begword را 3569b
midword را 3569b
endword را 3569b
lowword را 3569b

# Row 18, dots 3456. The initial-position entry is the numeric indicator.
midword رد 3456
endword رد 3456
word رد 3456

# Row 19, dots 236. The final-position entry is the question mark.
begword هر 2369c
midword هر 2369c
lowword هر 2369c

# Row 20, dots 1236.
begword لا 1236
midword لا 1236
endword لا 1236
word لا 1236
word اسلام 46-1236
word انقلاب 456-1236

# Row 21, dots 36. The final-position entry is the hyphen/dash.
begword ما 369d
midword ما 369d
lowword ما 369d

# Row 22, dots 1256.
begword ال 1256
midword ال 1256
endword ال 1256
word الله 1256
word اللّه 1256
word البته 456-1256

# Row 23, dots 25.
begword بی 259e
midword بی 259e
endword بی 259e
word بیشتر 46-25
word بیرون 456-25

# Row 24, dot 3. Initial and medial dot 3 are the manual's partial-attention
# indicator, not the literal print words "نیم توجه". In final position it is
# the ezafe sequence ه ی. The normalization rules above accept spaced,
# ZWNJ, combining-hamza, and precomposed-heh spellings as هی.
endword هی 39f

# Rows 25-27, final verbal suffixes.
endword یم 46
endword ید 45
endword ند 456

# The source likewise permits dot 3 after every Table 2-15 sign, but plain
# text does not encode most ezafe. Restrict forward translation to exact
# normalized ...هی forms for whole-word expansions ending in ه.
word بلکهی 456-15-3
word نتیجهی 45-246-3
word نمونهی 456-246-3
word ادارهی 45-12456-3
word اشارهی 46-12456-3
word استفادهی 46-34-3
word اللهی 1256-3
word اللّهی 1256-3
word البتهی 456-1256-3

# Short-height adjacency policy (printed page 89 / PDF page 90).
#
# The Persian chapter forbids two short-height cells beside one another when
# there is no tall-height cell immediately before or after the pair, and it
# explicitly includes punctuation. A later English-shortwriting section in
# the same manual defines short-height as lacking both dots 1 and 4; applying
# that definition here is a documented cross-chapter implementation choice.
# Each short-height fragment above carries a unique virtual marker so it can
# be expanded back to Grade 1 here without losing its print identity.
#
# When either fragment could be expanded, pass 2 expands the leftmost one.
# This deterministic tie-break follows the multipass approach in es-g2.ctb;
# it is an implementation policy, not an ordering supplied by the Persian
# manual. Literal sequences made solely of lower punctuation are preserved:
# changing those would invent source text rather than cancel a contraction.

swapdd cancelshort 26a,35b,35c,235d,23e,2356f,2569a,3569b,2369c,369d,259e,39f,269ab 1-1345,1-24-1345,24-1345,125-134,12-1,1245-1235,145-24,1235-1,125-1235,134-1,12-24,125-24,345-1345
swapdd finishshort 26a,35b,35c,235d,23e,2356f,2569a,3569b,2369c,369d,259e,39f,269ab 26,35,35,235,23,2356,256,356,236,36,25,3,26

# All nonblank six-dot cells without dot 1 or 4. shortcells also contains the
# virtual fragment cells; plainshortcells contains only literal lower cells.
swapdd shortcells 2,3,23,5,25,35,235,6,26,36,236,56,256,356,2356,26a,35b,35c,235d,23e,2356f,2569a,3569b,2369c,369d,259e,39f,269ab 2,3,23,5,25,35,235,6,26,36,236,56,256,356,2356,26,35,35,235,23,2356,256,356,236,36,25,3,26
swapdd plainshortcells 2,3,23,5,25,35,235,6,26,36,236,56,256,356,2356 2,3,23,5,25,35,235,6,26,36,236,56,256,356,2356
